Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1823
Death during apprehension or custody; powers.

In the performance of his or her duties under section 23-1822, the county coroner may, when applicable, invoke any or all of the provisions of sections 23-1815, 23-1816, and 23-1820.

Laws 1988, LB 676, § 3.